Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3824
Corporation; failure to file statement; penalty.

Any corporation organized under sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 neglecting to file the annual statement in the form and within the time provided by section 44-3823 shall forfeit one hundred dollars for each day during which such neglect continues, and, upon notice by the director to that effect, its authority to do business in this state shall cease while such default continues.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 24.